Indiana, session 2026, SB197.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 4-22-2.3-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.93-2024,
SECTION 20, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. The following apply to the department of
financial institutions:
(1) The department of financial institutions shall adopt rules
under the interim rule procedures in IC 4-22-2-37.2 announcing:
(A) sixty (60) days before January 1 of each odd-numbered
year in which dollar amounts under IC 24-4.5 (Uniform
Consumer Credit Code) are to change, the changes in dollar
amounts required by IC 24-4.5-1-106(2);
(B) promptly after the changes occur, changes in the Index
required by IC 24-4.5-1-106(3), including, when applicable,
the numerical equivalent of the Reference Base Index under a
revised Reference Base Index and the designation or title of
any index superseding the Index; and
(C) the adjustments required under IC 24-9-2-8 concerning
high cost home loans. and
SB 197—LS 6593/DI 154


(D) the adjustments required under IC 34-55-10-2 (bankruptcy
exemptions; limitations) or IC 34-55-10-2.5.
A rule described in this subdivision expires not later than January
of the next odd-numbered year after the department of financial
institutions is required to issue the rule.
(2) The department of financial institutions may adopt a rule
under the interim rule procedures in IC 4-22-2-37.2 for a rule
permitted under IC 24-4.4-1-101 (licensing system for creditors
and mortgage loan originators) or IC 24-4.5 (Uniform Consumer
Credit Code) if the department of financial institutions declares
an emergency. A rule described in this subdivision expires not
later than two (2) years after the rule is effective.
(3) The department of financial institutions may adopt a rule
described in IC 34-55-10-2 (bankruptcy exemptions; limitations)
or IC 34-55-10-2.5 in conformity with the procedures in
IC 4-22-2-23 through IC 4-22-2-36 or the interim rule procedures
in IC 4-22-2-37.2. A rule described in this subdivision adopted
under IC 4-22-2-37.2 expires not later than two (2) years after the
rule is accepted for filing by the publisher of the Indiana Register.
A rule described in this section may be continued in another interim
rule only if the governor determines under IC 4-22-2-37.2(c) that the
policy options available to the agency are so limited that use of the
additional notice, comment, and review procedures in IC 4-22-2-23
through IC 4-22-2-36 would provide no benefit to persons regulated or
otherwise affected by the rule.
SECTION 2. IC 24-4.5-5-105, AS AMENDED BY P.L.78-2014,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 105. (1) For the purposes of IC 24-4.5-5-101
through IC 24-4.5-5-108:
(a) "disposable earnings" means that part of the earnings of an
individual, including wages, commissions, income, rents, or
profits remaining after the deduction from those earnings of
amounts required by law to be withheld;
(b) "garnishment" means any legal or equitable proceedings
through which the earnings of an individual are required to be
withheld by a garnishee, by the individual debtor, or by any other
person for the payment of a judgment; and
(c) "support withholding" means that part of the earnings that are
withheld from an individual for child support in accordance with
the laws of this state.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (8), the maximum part of the
aggregate disposable earnings of an individual for any workweek which
SB 197—LS 6593/DI 154


is subjected to garnishment to enforce the payment of one (1) or more
judgments against the individual may not exceed the lesser of the
following amounts:
(a) An amount equal to twenty-five percent (25%) of the
individual's disposable earnings for that week or, upon a showing
of good cause by the individual why the amount should be
reduced, an amount equal to:
(i) less than twenty-five percent (25%); and
(ii) at least ten percent (10%);
of the individual's disposable earnings for that week.
(b) The amount by which the individual's disposable earnings for
that week exceed thirty (30) eighty-three (83) times the federal
minimum hourly wage prescribed by 29 U.S.C. 206(a)(1) in effect
at the time the earnings are payable.
In the case of earnings for a pay period other than a week, the earnings
shall be computed upon a multiple of the federal minimum hourly wage
equivalent to thirty (30) eighty-three (83) times the federal minimum
hourly wage as prescribed in this section.
(3) The maximum part of the aggregate disposable earnings of an
individual for any workweek which is subject to garnishment or
support withholding to enforce any order for the support of any person
shall not exceed:
(a) where such individual is supporting the individual's spouse or
dependent child (other than a spouse or child with respect to
whose support such order is used), fifty percent (50%) of such
individual's disposable earnings for that week; and
(b) where such individual is not supporting such a spouse or
dependent child described in subdivision (a), sixty percent (60%)
of such individual's disposable earnings for that week;
except that, with respect to the disposable earnings of any individual
for any workweek, the fifty percent (50%) specified in subdivision (a)
shall be deemed to be fifty-five percent (55%) and the sixty percent
(60%) specified in subdivision (b) shall be deemed to be sixty-five
percent (65%), if and to the extent that such earnings are subject to
garnishment or support withholding to enforce a support order with
respect to a period which is prior to the twelve (12) week period which
ends with the beginning of such workweek.
(4) No court may make, execute, or enforce an order or process in
violation of this section.
(5) An employer who is required to make deductions from an
individual's disposable earnings pursuant to a garnishment order or
series of orders arising out of the same judgment debt (excluding a
SB 197—LS 6593/DI 154


judgment for payment of child support) may collect, as a fee to
compensate the employer for making these deductions, an amount
equal to the greater of twelve dollars ($12) or three percent (3%) of the
total amount required to be deducted by the garnishment order or series
of orders arising out of the same judgment debt. If the employer
chooses to impose a fee, the fee shall be allocated as follows:
(a) One-half (1/2) of the fee shall be borne by the debtor, and that
amount may be deducted by the employer directly from the
employee's disposable earnings.
(b) One-half (1/2) of the fee shall be borne by the creditor, and
that amount may be retained by the employer from the amount
otherwise due the creditor.
The deductions made under this subsection for a collection fee do not
increase the amount of the judgment debt for which the fee is collected
for the purpose of calculating or collecting judgment interest. This fee
may be collected by an employer only once for each garnishment order
or series of orders arising out of the same judgment debt. The employer
may collect the entire fee from one (1) or more of the initial deductions
from the employee's disposable earnings. Alternatively, the employer
may collect the fee ratably over the number of pay periods during
which deductions from the employee's disposable earnings are
required.
(6) The deduction of the garnishment collection fee under
subsection (5)(a) or subsection (7) is not an assignment of wages under
IC 22-2-6.
(7) An employer who is required to make a deduction from an
individual's disposable earnings in accordance with a judgment for
payment of child support may collect a fee of two dollars ($2) each
time the employer is required to make the deduction. The fee may be
deducted by the employer from the individual's disposable earnings
each time the employer makes the deduction for support. If the
employer elects to deduct such a fee, the amount to be deducted for the
payment of support must be reduced accordingly if necessary to avoid
exceeding the maximum amount permitted to be deducted under
subsection (3).
(8) A support withholding order takes priority over a garnishment
order irrespective of their dates of entry or activation. If a person is
subject to a support withholding order and a garnishment order, the
garnishment order shall be honored only to the extent that disposable
earnings withheld under the support withholding order do not exceed
the maximum amount subject to garnishment as computed under
subsection (2).
SB 197—LS 6593/DI 154


(9) A garnishment order or attachment order that requires an
employer to make deductions from a debtor's disposable earnings
shall at least provide the following information to the employer:
(a) The debtor's name.
(b) The debtor's last known physical address.
(c) The debtor's last known mailing address.
(d) The amount owed by the debtor and information sufficient
to identify the judgment on which the garnishment order or
attachment order is based.
(e) The creditor's name and contact information.
If the information required by subdivisions (b) and (c) is unknown
to the creditor, the creditor shall indicate on the garnishment order
or attachment order that the information is unknown. The
information required by this subsection shall appear clearly and
conspicuously on a single page.
SECTION 3. IC 34-55-10-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.160-2012,
SECTION 65, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) This section does not apply to judgments
obtained before October 1, 1977.
(b) The amount of each exemption under subsection (c) applies until
a rule is adopted by the department of financial institutions under
section 2.5 of this chapter.
(c) (b) The following property of a debtor domiciled in Indiana is
exempt:
(1) Real estate or personal property constituting the personal or
family residence of the debtor or a dependent of the debtor, or
estates or rights in that real estate or personal property, of not
more than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000). twenty-two
thousand seven hundred fifty dollars ($22,750). The exemption
under this subdivision is individually available to joint debtors
concerning property held by them as tenants by the entireties.
(2) Other real estate or tangible personal property of eight
thousand dollars ($8,000). twelve thousand one hundred dollars
($12,100).
(3) Intangible personal property, including choses in action,
deposit accounts, and cash (but excluding debts owing and
income owing), of three hundred dollars ($300). one thousand
five hundred dollars ($1,500).
(4) Professionally prescribed health aids for the debtor or a
dependent of the debtor.
(5) Any interest that the debtor has in real estate held as a tenant
by the entireties. The exemption under this subdivision does not
SB 197—LS 6593/DI 154


apply to a debt for which the debtor and the debtor's spouse are
jointly liable.
(6) An interest, whether vested or not, that the debtor has in a
retirement plan or fund to the extent of:
(A) contributions, or portions of contributions, that were made
to the retirement plan or fund by or on behalf of the debtor or
the debtor's spouse:
(i) which were not subject to federal income taxation to the
debtor at the time of the contribution; or
(ii) which are made to an individual retirement account in
the manner prescribed by Section 408A of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986;
(B) earnings on contributions made under clause (A) that are
not subject to federal income taxation at the time of the levy;
and
(C) roll-overs of contributions made under clause (A) that are
not subject to federal income taxation at the time of the levy.
(7) Money that is in a medical care savings account established
under IC 6-8-11.
(8) Money that is in a health savings account established under
Section 223 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.
(9) Any interest the debtor has in a qualified tuition program, as
defined in Section 529(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986,
but only to the extent funds in the program are not attributable to:
(A) excess contributions, as described in Section 529(b)(6) of
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, and earnings on the excess
contributions;
(B) contributions made by the debtor within one (1) year
before the date of the levy or the date a bankruptcy petition is
filed by or against the debtor, and earnings on the
contributions; or
(C) the excess over five thousand dollars ($5,000) of aggregate
contributions made by the debtor for all programs under this
subdivision and education savings accounts under subdivision
(10) having the same designated beneficiary:
(i) not later than one (1) year before; and
(ii) not earlier than two (2) years before;
the date of the levy or the date a bankruptcy petition is filed by
or against the debtor, and earnings on the aggregate
contributions.
(10) Any interest the debtor has in an education savings account,
as defined in Section 530(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of
SB 197—LS 6593/DI 154


1986, but only to the extent funds in the account are not
attributable to:
(A) excess contributions, as described in Section 4973(e) of
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, and earnings on the excess
contributions;
(B) contributions made by the debtor within one (1) year
before the date of the levy or the date a bankruptcy petition is
filed by or against the debtor, and earnings on the
contributions; or
(C) the excess over five thousand dollars ($5,000) of aggregate
contributions made by the debtor for all accounts under this
subdivision and qualified tuition programs under subdivision
(9) having the same designated beneficiary:
(i) not later than one (1) year before; and
(ii) not earlier than two (2) years before;
the date of the levy or the date a bankruptcy petition is filed by
or against the debtor, and earnings on the excess contributions.
(11) The debtor's interest in a refund or a credit received or to be
received under the following:
(A) Section 32 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (the
federal earned income tax credit).
(B) IC 6-3.1-21-6 (the Indiana earned income tax credit).
(12) A disability benefit awarded to a veteran for a service
connected disability under 38 U.S.C. 1101 et seq. This
subdivision does not apply to a service connected disability
benefit that is subject to child and spousal support enforcement
under 42 U.S.C. 659(h)(1)(A)(ii)(V).
(13) Compensation distributed from the supplemental state fair
relief fund under IC 34-13-8 to an eligible person (as defined in
IC 34-13-8-1) for an occurrence (as defined in IC 34-13-8-2). This
subdivision applies even if a debtor is not domiciled in Indiana.
(d) (c) A bankruptcy proceeding that results in the ownership by the
bankruptcy estate of a debtor's interest in property held in a tenancy by
the entireties does not result in a severance of the tenancy by the
entireties.
(e) (d) Real estate or personal property upon which a debtor has
voluntarily granted a lien is not, to the extent of the balance due on the
debt secured by the lien:
(1) subject to this chapter; or
(2) exempt from levy or sale on execution or any other final
process from a court.
SECTION 4. IC 34-55-10-2.5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
SB 197—LS 6593/DI 154


1, 2026]. Sec. 2.5. (a) The department of financial institutions shall
adopt a rule under IC 4-22-2 establishing the amount for each
exemption under section 2(c)(1) through 2(c)(3) of this chapter to take
effect not earlier than January 1, 2010, and not later than March 1,
2010.
(b) The department of financial institutions shall adopt a rule under
IC 4-22-2 establishing new amounts for each exemption under section
2(c)(1) through 2(c)(3) of this chapter every six (6) years after
exemption amounts are established under subsection (a). The rule
establishing new exemption amounts under this subsection must take
effect not earlier than January 1 and not later than March 1 of the sixth
calendar year immediately following the most recent adjustments to the
exemption amounts.
(c) The department of financial institutions shall determine the
amount of each exemption under subsections (a) and (b) based on
changes in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers,
published by the United States Department of Labor, for the most
recent six (6) year period.
(d) The department of financial institutions shall round the amount
of an exemption determined under subsections (a) and (b) to the
nearest fifty dollars ($50).
(e) A rule establishing amounts for exemptions under this section
may not reduce an exemption amount below the exemption amount on
July 1, 2005.
SECTION 5. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) 750 IAC 1-1-1(c) is
void. The publisher of the Indiana Administrative Code and
Indiana Register shall remove this subsection from the Indiana
Administrative Code.
(b) This SECTION expires on July 1, 2027.
SB 197—LS 6593/DI 154


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Insurance and Financial
Institutions, to which was referred Senate Bill No. 197, has had the
same under consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the
Senate with the recommendation that said bill be AMENDED as
follows:
Delete everything after the enacting clause and insert the following:
(SEE TEXT OF BILL)
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to SB 197 as introduced.)
BALDWIN, Chairperson
Committee Vote: Yeas 6, Nays 2.
SB 197—LS 6593/DI 154